Utah statutes.
77-5-11.   Impeachment not a bar to prosecution.

The officer, whether convicted or acquitted, shall nevertheless be liable to prosecution, trial, and punishment according to law for any offense committed that constituted a basis for the impeachment proceedings.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

